Hawaii statutes.
§658A-1 Definitions. In this chapter:

"Arbitration organization" means an
association, agency, board, commission, or other entity that is neutral and
initiates, sponsors, or administers an arbitration proceeding or is involved in
the appointment of an arbitrator.

"Arbitrator" means an individual
appointed to render an award, alone or with others, in a controversy that is
subject to an agreement to arbitrate.

"Court" means any district or circuit
court of competent jurisdiction in this State, unless otherwise indicated. In
cases involving arbitration subject to chapter 89, chapter 377, or the National
Labor Relations Act, "court" means the circuit court of the
appropriate judicial circuit.

"Knowledge" means actual knowledge.

"Person" means an individual,
corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability
company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision,
agency, or instrumentality, public corporation, or any other legal or
commercial entity.

"Record" means information that is
inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other
medium and is retrievable in perceivable form. [L 2001, c 265, pt of §1; am L
2006, c 72, §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next